Washington statutes.
RCW 35.21.759

Public corporations, commissions, and authorities—Applicability of general laws. (Effective until January 1, 2026.)

A public corporation, commission, or authority created under this chapter, and officers and multimember governing body thereof, are subject to general laws regulating local governments, multimember governing bodies, and local governmental officials, including, but not limited to, the requirement to be audited by the state auditor and various accounting requirements provided under chapter 43.09 RCW, the open public record requirements of chapter 42.56 RCW, the prohibition on using its facilities for campaign purposes under RCW 42.17A.555, the open public meetings law of chapter 42.30 RCW, the code of ethics for municipal officers under chapter 42.23 RCW, and the local government whistleblower law under chapter 42.41 RCW.

[ 2011 c 60 s 16; 2005 c 274 s 265; 1999 c 246 s 1.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2011 c 60: See RCW 42.17A.919.

PDFRCW 35.21.759

Public corporations, commissions, and authorities—Applicability of general laws. (Effective January 1, 2026.)

A public corporation, commission, or authority created under this chapter, and officers and multimember governing body thereof, are subject to general laws regulating local governments, multimember governing bodies, and local governmental officials, including, but not limited to, the requirement to be audited by the state auditor and various accounting requirements provided under chapter 43.09 RCW, the open public record requirements of chapter 42.56 RCW, the prohibition on using its facilities for campaign purposes under RCW 29B.45.010, the open public meetings law of chapter 42.30 RCW, the code of ethics for municipal officers under chapter 42.23 RCW, and the local government whistleblower law under chapter 42.41 RCW.

[ 2024 c 164 s 510; 2011 c 60 s 16; 2005 c 274 s 265; 1999 c 246 s 1.]

NOTES:

Intent—Construction—Rules remain valid—Effective date—2024 c 164: See notes following RCW 29B.10.010.

Effective date—2011 c 60: See note following RCW 29B.20.030.